District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.37

Jurisdictional applicability.

The District Department of Transportation is authorized to plan, develop, finance, and operate the DC Circulator, as set forth in this subchapter, solely within the District of Columbia. Any expansion of the DC Circulator or such like service by another name into a jurisdiction beyond the District of Columbia shall require Council approval.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11g
as added Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-225, § 3(e), 53 DCR 10232
This section is referenced in § 50-921.38.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(e) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-3, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1439).